Florida, session 2026, SB7006.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSubsection (9) of section 350.01, Florida 13 Statutes, is amended to read: 14 350.01âFlorida Public Service Commission; terms of 15 commissioners; vacancies; election and duties of chair; quorum; 16 proceedings; public records and public meetings exemptions.â 17 (9)âNotwithstanding the provisions of subsection (8), those 18 portions of a hearing conducted by the commission wherein 19 proprietary confidential business information that is 20 confidential or exempt from s. 119.07(1), pursuant to s. 21 364.183, s. 366.093, s. 367.156, or s. 368.108, is discussed are 22 exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the State 23 Constitution. No exempt portion of a hearing may be off the 24 record, and all exempt portions shall be recorded and 25 transcribed. Such recordings and transcripts are confidential 26 and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 27 Constitution, unless a court of competent jurisdiction, after an 28 in camera review, determines that the hearing was not restricted 29 to the discussion of proprietary confidential business 30 information made confidential and exempt pursuant to s. 364.183, 31 s. 366.093, s. 367.156, or s. 368.108. In the event of such a 32 judicial determination, only that portion of the recording and 33 transcript which reveals nonexempt information may be disclosed 34 to a third party. This subsection is subject to the Open 35 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 36 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and 37 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 38 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.